Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB214.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 167.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The superintendent of the Kentucky School for the Deaf shall be appointed by
the chief state school officer. The appointment shall be made upon
recommendation of a search committee which shall be appointed by the
Kentucky Board of Education whenever appointment of a superintendent
becomes necessary.
(b) The appointment of the superintendent shall be made within thirty (30) days
of the recommendation of the search committee, unless the chief state
school officer provides written notification to the Kentucky Board of
Education of the reasoning for the failure to make the appointment within
the allotted time.
(2) (a) The search committee for the superintendent of the Kentucky School for the
Deaf shall be appointed within thirty (30) days of receiving notice of a
vacancy and shall consist of the representative of the[ State] Department of
Education selected by the chief state school officer, one (1) representative of
the Kentucky Association of the Deaf, Inc., one (1) representative of the
Kentucky School for the Deaf Alumni Association, Inc., one (1)
representative of the Kentucky School for the Deaf faculty, one (1) parent of a
student at the Kentucky School for the Deaf, and one (1) representative of the
Kentucky School for the Deaf advisory board.
(b) The search committee's recommendation shall[must] be approved by a
majority of the Kentucky Board of Education members.
(c) In making its recommendation, the search committee shall prioritize
candidates who are willing to reside near the Kentucky School for the Deaf
facilities and commit to full-time employment as superintendent of the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1863
Kentucky School for the Deaf.
(3) The superintendent of the Kentucky School for the Deaf may be removed from
office by the Kentucky Board of Education only by a majority vote of the Kentucky
Board of Education.
(4) A current or former employee of the Kentucky Department of Education or a
current or former member of the Kentucky Board of Education shall not be
eligible for consideration for appointment as the superintendent of the Kentucky
School for the Deaf for a period of one (1) year after:
(a) The date of leaving the position or termination of employment; or
(b) The date the term of office to which the member of the board was appointed
expires.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, this section shall not be construed
to prohibit a binding contract for the employment of a superintendent for the
Kentucky School for the Deaf entered into prior to the effective date of this Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed